Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-17,107
Nursing Student Loan Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nursing Student Loan Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be the repository for loan repayments received under section 71-17,105. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2001, LB 468, § 7.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.